Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.230.085

Curriculum for prevention of sexual abuse on superintendent's website.

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make the curriculum included under RCW 28A.300.160(1)(b) available on its website.

[ 2018 c 64 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2018 c 64: See note following RCW 28A.300.160.